Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.......................... $ 286,091
(2) Extraordinary expenses ............ $ 20,073
SECTION 2. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5013 (HB 5013-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 13, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5013 (HB 5013-A) Page 2